Utah statutes.
62A-7-111.5.   Cost of support and maintenance of youth offender -- Responsibility.

On commitment of a youth offender to the division, and on recommendation of the division to the juvenile court, the juvenile court may order the youth offender or his parent, guardian, or custodian, to share in the costs of support and maintenance for the youth offender during his term of commitment.



Amended by Chapter 308, 2007 General Session

